Utah statutes.
53A-1a-104.   Characteristics of public education system.
The Legislature shall assist in maintaining a public education system that has
the following characteristics:
(1)  assumes that all students have the ability to learn and that each student
departing the system will be prepared to achieve success in productive
employment, further education, or both;
(2)  provides a personalized education plan or personalized education
occupation plan for each student, which involves the student, the student's
parent or guardian, and school personnel in establishing the plan;
(3)  provides students with the knowledge and skills to take responsibility
for their decisions and to make appropriate choices;
(4)  provides opportunities for students to exhibit the capacity to learn,
think, reason, and work effectively, individually and in groups;
(5)  offers a world-class core curriculum that enables students to
successfully compete in a global society, and to succeed as citizens of a
constitutional republic;
(6)  incorporates an information retrieval system that provides students,
parents, and educators with reliable, useful, and timely data on the progress
of each student;
(7)  attracts, prepares, inducts, and retains excellent teachers for every
classroom in large part through collaborative efforts among the State Board of
Education, the State Board of Regents, and school districts, provides
effective ongoing professional development opportunities for teachers to
improve their teaching skills, and provides recognition, rewards, and
compensation for their excellence;
(8)  empowers each school district and public school to create its own vision
and plan to achieve results consistent with the objectives outlined in this
chapter;
(9)  uses technology to improve teaching and learning processes and for the
delivery of educational services;
(10)  promotes ongoing research and development projects at the district and
the school level that are directed at improving or enhancing public education;
(11)  offers a public school choice program, which gives students and their
parents options to best meet the student's personalized education needs;
(12)  emphasizes the involvement of educators, parents, business partnerships,
and the community at large in the educational process by allowing them to be
involved in establishing and implementing educational goals and participating
in decision-making at the school site; and
(13)  emphasizes competency-based standards and progress-based assessments,
including tracking and measurement systems.
